West Virginia, session 2025, SB349.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 11, 2024, authorized under the authority of §11-10-5t of this code, modified by the State Tax Department to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 3, 2024, relating to the State Tax Department (payment of taxes by electronic funds transfer, 110 CSR 10F), is authorized.